Missouri, session 2026, HB3464.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 389, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 389.1220, to read as follows:
389.1220. 1. For purposes of this section, "personally identifying information"
includes a crew member's or engineer's name, home address, personal telephone
number, driver's license number, Social Security number, or other information that
could reasonably be used to identify or locate such individual.
2. Personally identifying information of train crew members and engineers
contained in reports or communications related to railroad incidents involving motor
vehicles shall be redacted from any publicly released records.
3. Unredacted copies of such records shall be accessible only:
(1) To the employing railroad or its authorized representatives;
(2) By court order, and to others specifically authorized by such order; or
(3) To law enforcement agencies, the attorney general's office, or the department
of transportation if the information is necessary to perform their official duties.
4. If a court determines that a crew member or engineer was not at fault in a
railroad incident involving a motor vehicle, such person's identifying information shall
remain confidential in all public records.
5. The department of transportation shall enforce this section and may
promulgate rules to ensure compliance and confidentiality. Any rule or portion of a
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3464 2
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and
chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔